Utah statutes.
63G-14-204.   Resident immigrant permit.

(1)  The department shall:

(a)  create a resident immigrant permit to be issued to an individual who is a resident immigrant that:

(i)  is of impervious material that is resistant to wear or damage; and

(ii)  minimizes the risk that the permit may be forged, falsified, or counterfeited; and

(b)  ensure that a permit:

(i)  includes a photograph of the individual to whom the permit is issued;

(ii)  prominently states the day on which the permit expires;

(iii)  prominently states the type of permit; and

(iv)  includes a unique identifier.

(2)  The department shall establish the fee under Section 63G-14-202 to be adequate to pay the costs incurred to issue a permit.

